pt-PT: Mecanismo de bloqueio da tampa do depósito de combustível: Combinação; Com chave; Chaves iguais; Chave única; Com trinco de porta de fecho; Outro
da: Låsemekanisme for brændstofdæksel: Kombination; Med nøgle; Ens nøgler; Unikke nøgler; Med låsbar klap; Andet
ro-RO: Mecanismul de blocare a capacului rezervorului de combustibil: Cifru; Cu cheie; Cu cheie comună; Cu cheie unică; Cu încuietoare pentru ușiță; Altele
es: Mecanismo de bloqueo de la tapa de combustible: Combinación; Con llave; Misma llave; Llave única; Con pestillo de puerta con seguro; Otro
ja: 燃料キャップロックメカニズム: コンビネーション; キー式; 同一キー; 固有キー; ロック付きドアラッチ; その他
sl-SI: Zaklepni mehanizem pokrova rezervoarja: Kombinacija; Na ključ; Enak ključ; Edinstven ključ; Z zaklepom vratc; Drugo
th: กลไกการล็อกฝาปิดถังน้ำมัน: แบบรหัส; แบบใช้กุญแจ; กุญแจดอกเดียวกัน; กุญแจเฉพาะ; พร้อมสลักล็อกประตู; อื่นๆ
nb: Låsemekanisme for drivstofflokk: Kombinasjon; Med nøkkel; Liksperrende; Unik nøkkel; Med låseluke; Annet
pt-BR: Mecanismo de travamento da tampa do tanque de combustível: Combinação; Com chave; Mesmo segredo; Segredo único; Com trinco de porta com trava; Outro
fr: Mécanisme de verrouillage du bouchon du réservoir: À combinaison; À clé; Clés identiques; Clés uniques; Avec loquet de trappe verrouillable; Autre
sk-SK: Uzamykací mechanizmus viečka palivovej nádrže: Kombinačný zámok; Na kľúč; Na rovnaký kľúč; Na unikátny kľúč; S uzamykateľnou západkou dvierok; Iné
bg-BG: Заключващ механизъм на капачката за гориво: С шифър; С ключ; Еднакви ключове; Уникален ключ; Със заключваща се вратичка; Друго
hr-HR: Mehanizam zaključavanja čepa goriva: Na šifru; S ključem; Isti ključ; Jedinstveni ključ; Sa zasunom vrata s bravom; Ostalo
cs: Zámkový mechanismus víčka palivové nádrže: Kombinační; Na klíč; Sjednocený klíč; Unikátní klíč; S uzamykatelnou západkou dvířek; Ostatní
nl: Vergrendelingsmechanisme brandstofdop: Combinatie; Met sleutel; Gelijksluitend; Verschillend sluitend; Met vergrendelbare klep; Anders
ru: Механизм блокировки крышки топливного бака: Кодовый; С ключом; Под один ключ; С уникальным ключом; С запираемой защелкой лючка; Другое
el: Μηχανισμός ασφάλισης τάπας καυσίμου: Συνδυασμός; Με κλειδί; Με ίδιο κλειδί; Με μοναδικό κλειδί; Με μάνδαλο κλειδώματος θύρας; Άλλο
pl: Mechanizm zamykający korka wlewu paliwa: Zamek szyfrowy; Na klucz; Jeden klucz (keyed alike); Unikalny klucz; Z zatrzaskiem blokującym klapkę; Inny
hu: Üzemanyagbetöltő sapka zármechanizmusa: Kombinációs; Kulcsos; Azonos kulccsal nyitható; Egyedi kulccsal nyitható; Zárható ajtózárral; Egyéb
ko: 연료 캡 잠금 메커니즘: 콤비네이션; 키형; 동일 키형; 개별 키형; 도어 래치 잠금 포함; 기타
vi: Cơ chế khóa nắp bình nhiên liệu: Mật mã; Chìa khóa; Chìa khóa đồng bộ; Chìa khóa riêng; Kèm chốt cửa khóa; Khác
zh-TW: 油箱蓋鎖定機制: 密碼鎖; 鑰匙鎖; 同號鎖; 獨立鎖; 附門鎖卡榫; 其他
tr: Yakıt kapağı kilitleme mekanizması: Şifreli; Anahtarlı; Eş anahtarlı; Özel anahtarlı; Kilitli kapı mandallı; Diğer
it: Meccanismo di chiusura del tappo del carburante: A combinazione; Con chiave; Con chiave uguale; Con chiave unica; Con sportellino di chiusura; Altro
de: Tankdeckel-Verriegelungsmechanismus: Zahlenkombination; Mit Schlüssel; Gleichschließend; Verschiedenschließend; Mit verriegelbarer Klappe; Sonstige
lt-LT: Degalų dangtelio užrakinimo mechanizmas: Kombinuotas; Su raktu; Vienodas raktas; Unikalus raktas; Su užrakinamu durelių fiksatoriumi; Kita
en: Fuel cap locking mechanism: Combination; Keyed; Keyed alike; Keyed unique; With locking door latch; Other
fi: Polttoainesäiliön korkin lukitusmekanismi: Yhdistelmä; Avaimella lukittava; Sarjoitettu (samoilla avaimilla); Yksittäislukittu; Lukittavalla luukulla; Muu
sv: Verktygslös låsmekanism: Kombination; Med nyckel; Lika låsning; Unik låsning; Med låsbar dörrspärr; Övrigt
zh-CN: 油箱盖锁定装置: 密码锁; 钥匙锁; 同匙锁; 异匙锁; 带锁定门插销; 其他